Hawaii, session 2025, SB129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that local tuna fisheries and associated seafood markets are an important sector of the State's economy and food production and that the identification of foreign imported tuna is critical to inform and safeguard consumers. According to statistics from the United States Department of Commerce, the annual dockside value of commercial yellowfin and bigeye tuna (marked as ahi) landed in Hawaii's ports is around $100,000,000, making tuna the highest valued food commodity produced in the State.  Even with these impressive landings, previously frozen and carbon monoxide-treated foreign imported tuna dominates sales at local retail establishments. Due to a loophole in federal country of origin labeling requirements for seafood, retail establishments are not providing consumers with information on where the ahi tuna originates.  The legislature is therefore concerned that most consumers that buy ahi at local retail establishments falsely believe that previously frozen, gas-treated ahi is caught by Hawaii fisheries. Moreover, the legislature further notes that the majority of raw ahi sold at local retail establishments is in the form of poke and sushi products.  Consumers of poke are commonly subjected to misleading advertisements and in-store terminology, such as "prepared fresh", "freshly made", and "locally made", while the ahi used to prepare the poke is foreign-sourced, previously frozen, gas-treated, and imported in pre-cut cubes. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to extend country of origin labeling requirements for certain ahi tuna products at Hawaii retail establishments. SECTION 2. Chapter 486, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part V to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§486-    Raw ahi; ahi poke; processed ahi; labeling requirements; country of origin; retail establishments.  (a)  No retail establishment shall keep, offer, display, expose for sale, or solicit for the sale of any raw ahi, including ahi poke, processed ahi, or any raw ahi that has been combined, mixed, marinated, or otherwise prepared for human consumption, without a label stating the country in which the ahi was landed. (b)  For the purposes of this section: "Ahi" means yellowfin tuna or bigeye tuna, including those that meet the definition of: (1)  "Wild fish and shellfish" as defined in title 7 Code of Federal Regulations section 60.133, as amended; or (2)  "Farm-raised fish" as defined in title 7 Code of Federal Regulations section 60.106, as amended. "Ahi poke" means cubed, cut, or sliced raw ahi mixed with other ingredients, including but not limited to seasonings and vegetables. "Processed ahi" means a retail item derived from ahi that has undergone specific processing resulting in a change in the character of the ahi, or that has been combined with at least one other substantive food component, except that the addition of a component that enhances or represents a further step in the preparation of the product for consumption would not in itself result in a processed food item, and does not mean canned tuna. "Retail establishment" means an establishment licensed under the Perishable Agricultural Commodities Act of 1930, which includes any retail establishment that purchases over $230,000 of fresh or frozen produce per calendar year." SECTION 3.  If any provision of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are severable. SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.